ru: Мебель > Диваны: Бескаркасные диваны; Диваны-кушетки; Угловые диваны; Двухместные диваны; Секционные диваны; Диваны-кровати
pl: Meble > Sofy: Sofy sako; Sofy szezlong; Sofy narożne; Krótkie sofy; Sofy modułowe; Sofy rozkładane
ro-RO: Mobilier > Canapele: Canapele tip puf; Canapele tip șezlong; Colțare; Canapele loveseat; Canapele modulare; Canapele extensibile
bg-BG: Мебели > Дивани: Дивани тип „барбарони“; Дивани с лежанка; Ъглови дивани; Двуместни дивани; Секционни дивани; Разтегателни дивани
es: Mobiliario > Sofás: Sofás puf; Sofás con chaise longue; Sofás esquineros; Sofás de dos plazas; Sofás seccionales; Sofás cama
vi: Đồ gỗ > Ghế sofa: Ghế sofa lười; Sofa ghế dài; Sofa đặt góc; Ghế sofa đôi; Ghế sofa nhiều chỗ ngồi; Giường Sofa
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Sofás: Sofás pufe; Sofás Chaise Longue; Sofás de canto; Sofás Loveseat; Sofás seccionais; Sofás-cama
ko: 가구 > 소파: 빈백 소파; 긴 등받이 의자형 소파; 코너 소파; 2인용 소파; 분리형 개별 소파; 소파베드
fi: Huonekalut > Sohvat: Säkkituolisohvat; Divaanisohvat; Nurkkasohvat; Kahdenistuttavat sohvat; Modulaariset sohvat; Vuodesohvat
nl: Meubelen > Sofa's: Zitzakbanken; Lange leunstoelsofa's; Hoeksofa's; Loveseatbanken; Zitbanken; Slaapbanken
ja: 家具 > ソファ: ビーズクッションソファ; シェーズロングソファー; コーナーソファ; 二人掛けソファ; 組み合わせ式ソファー; ソファベッド
hu: Bútor > Kanapék: Babzsák kanapék; Heverőkanapék; Sarokkanapék; Kétszemélyes kanapék; Szekcionált kanapék; Kanapéágyak
zh-TW: 家具 > 沙發: 懶骨頭沙發; 沙發躺椅; 角落沙發; 雙人沙發; 組合沙發; 沙發床
fr: Meubles > Canapés: Canapés poufs; Canapés méridienne; Canapés d’angle; Canapés causeuses; Canapés sectionnels; Canapés-lits
de: Möbel > Sofas: Sitzsack-Sofas; Chaiselongue-Sofas; Ecksofas; Pärchensofas; Modulsofas; Schlafsofas
sv: Möbler > Soffor: Sittsäckssoffor; Schäslongsoffor; Hörnsoffor; Loveseat-soffor; Sektionssoffor; Bäddsoffor
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > โซฟา: โซฟาบีนแบ็ก; โซฟานวมยาว; โซฟาเข้ามุม; โซฟาเลิฟซีท; โซฟาแบบแบ่งส่วน; เตียงโซฟาพับ
nb: Møbler > Sofaer: Sittesekksofaer; Sjeselongsofaer; Hjørnesofaer; Loveseat-sofaer; Seksjonssofaer; Sovesofaer
pt-BR: Móveis > Sofás: Sofás tipo pufe; Sofás Chaise Longue; Sofás de canto; Sofás Loveseat; Sofás modulares; Sofás-cama
hr-HR: Namještaj > Sofe: Sofe u stilu vreća za sjedenje; Sofe za ležanje; Kutne sofe; Dvosjedi; Kutni kaučevi; Kauči na razvlačenje
cs: Nábytek > Pohovky: Sedací vaky ve tvaru pohovky; Šezlongové pohovky; Rohové pohovky; 2místné pohovky; Sektorové pohovky; Rozkládací pohovky
sk-SK: Nábytok > Pohovky: Pohovky zo sedacích vakov; Leňošky; Rohové pohovky; 2-pohovky; Sedacie súpravy; Rozkladacie pohovky
zh-CN: 家具 > 沙发: 豆袋沙发; 贵妃椅沙发; 转角沙发罩; 双人沙发; 组合沙发; 沙发床
el: Έπιπλα > Καναπέδες: Καναπέδες πουφ; Καναπέδες σεζ λονγκ; Γωνιακοί καναπέδες; Καναπέδες δύο θέσεων; Καναπέδες σε κομμάτια; Καναπέδες-κρεβάτια
it: Arredamento > Divani: Divani a sacco; Divani Chaise Longue; Divani angolari; Divani a due posti; Divani componibili; Divani letto
da: Møbler > Sofaer: Sækkestolsofaer; Chaiselongsofaer; Hjørnesofaer; Loveseat-sofaer; Sektionssofaer; Sovesofaer
lt-LT: Baldai > Sofos: Sėdmaišio sofos; Šezlongų tipo sofos; Kampinės sofos; Dvivietės sofos; Sekcijinės sofos; Sofos-lovos
en: Furniture > Sofas: Bean Bag Sofas; Chaise Longue Sofas; Corner Sofas; Loveseat Sofas; Sectional Sofas; Sofa Beds
tr: Mobilyalar > Kanepeler: Armut koltuklar; Uzanma Kanepeleri; Köşe Kanepeler; İki Kişilik Kanepeler; Bölmeli Kanepeler; Yataklı Kanepeler
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Sedežne garniture: Kavči s stiropornimi kroglicami; Sedežne garniture z ležalnikom; Kotne sedežne garniture; Sedežne garniture za dve osebi; Modularne zofe; Raztegljivi kavči